ani_nouns_lexicon.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# DO NOT EDIT! THIS FILE IS CREATED AUTOMATICALLY!
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON Nouns_Abs_Sg
